Illinois, session 104th, SB1159.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Roadside Memorial Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (605 ILCS 125/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Roadside Memorial Act.9(Source: P.A. 95-398, eff. 1-1-08.)